Florida, session 2026, HB33.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Transportation facility designations;
Department of Transportation to erect suitable markers.—
(1) That portion of S.R. 985/S.W. 107th Avenue between
S.W. 24th Street and S.R. 90/S.W. 8th Street in Miami-Dade
County is designated as "Charlie Kirk Memorial Avenue."
(2) That portion of S.R. 870/Commercial Boulevard between
W. Tradewinds Avenue and the eastern terminus of Commercial
Boulevard in Broward County is designated as "President Donald
J. Trump Boulevard."
(3) The Department of Transportation is directed to erect
suitable markers designating the transportation facilities as
described in this section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb33 -01-er